Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2208
License, defined.

License, for purposes of discipline, includes the multistate licensure privilege to practice granted by the Nurse Licensure Compact. If the multistate licensure privilege is restricted due to disciplinary action by the home state, the department may, upon request by the individual, grant the authority to practice in this state.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 764.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.